California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) The department shall consult with affected contracted health plans in developing the regional groups and rate methodologies, consistent with applicable federal requirements, actuarial methods, and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14184.101 prior to implementing this subdivision. In developing and implementing any methodology pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall seek to incentivize improved quality and outcomes for Medi-Cal managed care enrollees.

(5) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and that federal financial participation is available and not
 otherwise jeopardized.

(p) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that both affected contracted health plans and the state have appropriate actuarial protections against the risk of either significant overpayments or significant underpayments in capitation rates developed and paid pursuant to this section that are associated with the changes to the Medi-Cal managed care program described in Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, as identified by the department.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, as a component of the CalAIM initiative authorized pursuant to Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, and any successor waiver, demonstration, or state plan amendment authorizing the Medi-Cal
 managed care program, the department may develop and implement appropriate actuarial methods to prevent significant overpayments or significant underpayments as described in paragraph (1), subject to paragraph (4). This may include, but need not be limited to, one or more of the following:

(i) A medical or profit and loss risk corridor.

(ii) Blended capitation rates based on projected member risk.

(iii) Other prospective or retrospective shared savings or risk models.

(B) The methods or models described in subparagraph (A) shall seek to encourage quality improvement and promote appropriate utilization incentives, including, but not limited to,
 reduced rehospitalization and shorter lengths of institutional stay.

(3) The department shall consult with affected contracted health plans in implementing this subdivision.

(4) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 163.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, and subject to subdivisions (e) and (f), in order to account for the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency on Medi-Cal managed care capitation rates, the department shall develop and pay capitation rates and capitation increments under any Medi-Cal managed care plan contract pursuant to this section.

(b) In consultation with affected Medi-Cal managed care plans, the department shall develop and implement a risk corridor that is symmetrical to risk and profit to limit the financial risk of either significant capitation rate overpayments or underpayments, pursuant to both of the following:

(1) The risk corridor shall apply to those capitation
 increments, services and populations, as determined by the department.

(2) The risk corridor shall apply from July 1, 2019, to December 31, 2020, inclusive. The department may continue to apply the risk corridor for rating periods starting on or after January 1, 2021, if the department determines that the continuation of the risk corridor is actuarially appropriate and necessary to account for the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(c) To the extent the department determines appropriate, the department shall reduce applicable capitation rate increments by up to 1.5 percent pursuant to subsection (c)(3) of Section 438.7 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations for capitation rates associated with the July 1, 2019, to December 31, 2020 rating period. The department may apply this reduction to rating periods starting on or after January 1, 2021, if the department
 determines that the continued reduction is actuarially appropriate and necessary to account for the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(d) The department shall evaluate the impact of the COVID-19 public health emergency on capitation rates it develops and pays under Medi-Cal managed care plan contracts, and shall make any adjustments it determines are necessary to ensure capitation rates are actuarially appropriate.

(e) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement the adjustments described in this section, subject to subdivision (f). If federal approval is
 unavailable with respect to one or more of the adjustments described in this section, or if one or more of the adjustments is held to be invalid or unconstitutional by a decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, the department shall implement the remaining adjustments for which any necessary federal approvals are obtained.

(f) The department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, may modify the requirements of this section, or modify any application of this section with respect to certain capitation rate increments, certain Medi-Cal managed care enrollee categories and subcategories of aid, or certain categories or subcategories of medical assistance provided under a Medi-Cal managed care plan contract, if the department determines necessary to meet federal requirements, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to maximize federal financial participation.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “COVID-19 public health emergency” means the Public Health Emergency declared by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services on January 31, 2020 pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code (entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus”), and any subsequent renewal of such declaration.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed
 care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 68.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.2.

(a) The director may defer fee-for-service payments or payments to Medi-Cal managed care health plans contracting with the department pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088), or Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of this chapter, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), the Senior Care Action Network Health Plan, and Medi-Cal managed care health plan providers, as applicable, which are payable during the final month of the state fiscal year. This section may be implemented only to the extent consistent with federal law.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 34 of Chapter 37 of the Statutes of 2013, this section shall not be made inoperative as a result of any determination made by the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 34 of Chapter 37 of the Statutes of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 76.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.3.

The department shall ensure that Medi-Cal managed care plans demonstrate ongoing ability and readiness to perform the obligations set forth in Section 14132.195. The department shall, as may be appropriate and in its discretion, adjust the capitation rate of a Medi-Cal managed care plan to promote improved outcomes through value-based purchasing payment protocols to create improved incentives for outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 387, Sec. 4.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.4.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized and consistent with federal law, that the intergovernmental transfers described in this section provide support for the nonfederal share of risk-based payments to managed care health plans to enable those plans to compensate providers designated by the transferring entity for Medi-Cal health care services and for support of the Medi-Cal program.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Intergovernmental transfer” or “IGT” means the transfer of public funds by the transferring entity to the state in
 accordance with the requirements of this section.

(2) “Managed care health plan” means a Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting with the department under this chapter or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), or Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of Chapter 7.

(3) “Public provider” means any provider that is able to certify public expenditures under state and federal Medicaid law.

(4) “Rate range increases” means increases to risk-based payments to managed care health plans to increase the payments from the lower bound of the range determined to be actuarially sound to the upper bound of that range, as determined by the department’s actuaries to take into account the variations in underwriting, risk,
 return on investment, and contingencies.

(5) “Transferring entity” means a public entity, which may be a city, county, special purpose district, or other governmental unit in the state, regardless of whether the unit of government is also a health care provider, except as prohibited by federal law.

(c) To the extent permitted by federal law, a transferring entity may elect to make an intergovernmental transfer to the state, and the department may accept all intergovernmental transfers from a transferring entity, for the purposes of providing support for the nonfederal share of risk-based payments to managed care health plans to enable those plans to compensate providers designated by the transferring entity for Medi-Cal health care services and for the support of the Medi-Cal program. The transferring entity shall certify to the department that the funds it proposes to transfer
 satisfy the requirements of this section and are in compliance with all federal rules and regulations.

(d) (1) Pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), the state shall, upon acceptance of the IGT described in subdivision (c), assess a fee of 20 percent on each IGT subject to this section to reimburse the department for the administrative costs of operating the IGT program pursuant to this section and for the support of the Medi-Cal program.

(2) The IGTs subject to the fee shall be limited to those made by a transferring entity to provide the nonfederal share of rate range increases.

(3) The 20-percent assessment shall not apply to IGTs designated for increases to risk-based payments to managed care health plans intended to increase reimbursement for designated public providers for purposes of
 equaling the amount of reimbursement the public provider would have received through certified public expenditures under the fee-for-service payment methodology.

(4) The 20-percent assessment shall not apply to IGTs authorized pursuant to Sections 14168.7 and 14182.15.

(e) Participation in the intergovernmental transfers pursuant to this section is voluntary on the part of the transferring entities for the purposes of all applicable federal laws.

(f) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(g) To the extent that the director determines that the payments made pursuant to this section do not comply with the federal Medicaid requirements, the director retains the discretion to return the IGTs or not
 accept the IGTs.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of policy letters or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(j) This section shall be implemented on July 1, 2011, or the date on which all necessary federal approvals have been received, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 19.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.5.

(a) (1) To the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized and consistent with federal law, and subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (b), the department shall pay Medi-Cal managed care plans rate range increases, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14301.4, at a minimum level of 75 percent of the rate range available with respect to all enrollees who are newly eligible beneficiaries for purposes of this section. If a nonfederal share is necessary to fund the rate range increases, a county public hospital health system as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 17612.2 or affiliated governmental entity may voluntarily provide intergovernmental transfers for the nonfederal share. 

(2) The increased payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans that would be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment in the absence of this section, including, but not limited to, payments described in Section 14182.15, shall not be reduced as a consequence of payment under this section. 

(b) Payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to subdivision (a) are conditioned on all of the following: 

(1) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall pay all of the rate range increases provided under this section as additional payments to county public hospital health systems for providing and making available services to Medi-Cal enrollees of the plan. 

(2) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall demonstrate that it has a contract or other arrangement
 in place with county public hospital health systems to provide additional payments to county public hospital health systems for services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries that meet the requirements of paragraph (1). The existence of those agreements or arrangements shall be reported to the department by the county public hospital health system. 

(3) Additional payments described in paragraph (1) shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by Medi-Cal managed care plans to county public hospital health systems. A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not impose a fee or retention amount, or reduce other payments to a county public hospital health system, that would result in a direct or indirect reduction to these payments. 

(4) The county public hospital health system or affiliated governmental entity voluntarily provides an intergovernmental transfer of public funds to
 the state for use as the nonfederal share, if any, of the increased capitation rates. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4, or any other similar fee. 

(c) To the extent a Medi-Cal managed care plan is not compliant with any of the requirements imposed upon it pursuant to this section, the department shall reduce by 25 percent the default assignment into the Medi-Cal managed care plan with respect to all Medi-Cal beneficiaries, as long as the other Medi-Cal managed care plan or plans in that county have the capacity to receive the additional default membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 24, Sec. 3.   (AB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14302.

Except as provided in Section 14490, the duration of initial contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be for a maximum of one year and of renewed contracts for a maximum of five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1061.)
-------------------------------------------

14302.1.

(a) (1) Once it is determined that a contract shall be renewed pursuant to this chapter with a prepaid health plan, by the state agency responsible for negotiating these contracts, the agency shall, no later than 25 working days prior to the expiration date of the existing contract or immediately, if that date has passed, draft an extension of the existing contract for a period not to exceed two calendar months.
 A contract extension shall contain the same terms as the prior existing contract except for the contract’s expiration date. The contract extension shall be for a period of time not to exceed two months from the termination date of the original contract.

(2) The state agency responsible for negotiating the contract shall simultaneously submit to each federal and state agency required to approve a contract extension, a draft of the contract for extension no later than 20 working days prior to the expiration date of the prior existing contract.

(3) Each state agency to which an extension for contract has been submitted shall approve or disapprove the extension no later than 10 working days after receipt of the contract.

(4) In the course of any contract negotiations, the responsible state agency shall encourage the participation of other involved state and federal agencies in the negotiation process and shall cooperate with those agencies and with the contractor, or
 proposed contractor, to seek the resolution of any obstacles to contractual agreement.

(5) No extension shall become effective until and unless federal approval is received indicating that federal funds will be available for services provided under the Medi-Cal program during the period of the contract extension.

(6) These contract extensions shall remain in force and effect until such time as:

(A) The contract expires because the extension date has been reached.

(B) The
 contract for renewal is entered into and is in force and effect.

(C) The state agency responsible for negotiating the contract determines not to contract or renew a contract with the provider and notifies the provider in writing to that effect.

(D) The state agency responsible for negotiating the contract terminates the contract in
 accordance with Section 14197.7.

(b) When contract renewals are entered into, the effective date of the contract shall be the termination date of the prior contract, not the ending date of any contract extension. The state agency responsible for negotiating the contract, once a new contract is finalized, shall retroactively make adjustments in any amounts paid under the contract extension to reflect
 the new terms and rates of reimbursements as provided in the new contract.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the payment of services provided for under this chapter in a timely and efficient manner. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to hinder, prohibit, or interfere with the negotiating and contract process of the responsible state agency and provider.

(d) This section shall apply only to those instances in which both parties have reason to believe that their contract renewal process will not be completed by the termination date of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 7.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.

No contract between the department and the prepaid health plan shall be amended without the public notice and if necessary the holding of a public hearing as required in Section 14300 if such amendments make any of the following changes in the contract:

(a) Reduction in the scope or availability of services.

(b) Enlargement of the service area.

(c) Increase in the maximum enrollment permitted under the contract.

(d) Any other change in the plan’s organization, operation, or delivery of services which the director determines will have a substantial impact on the ability of enrollees to obtain health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1073, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.1.

The department shall have authority to amend a prepaid health plan contract in accordance with the terms of a merger of a prepaid health plan with another organization or organizations other than the plan’s subsidiary corporation, its parent corporation, or another subsidiary of its parent corporation, provided the surviving organization meets the following conditions:

(a) The surviving organization assures the continued and accessible delivery of health care services to enrollees.

(b) The plans concerned have satisfactorily demonstrated the fiscal and administrative soundness of the newly proposed organization.

(c) The enrollees of the plans concerned are informed of the impending merger, any resulting changes in the service area or delivery of health care services, and such other information required by subdivision (a) of Section 14406 at least 30 days in advance of the merger.

(d) The enrollees of the plans concerned are given the option of disenrolling for any cause within 60 days following the effective date of the merger.

(e) Public notice is given and if necessary a public hearing is held as required by Section 14300.

(f) The organization meets such other requirements as deemed necessary by the department in order to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1073, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.2.

The department shall have authority to amend a prepaid health plan contract in accordance with the terms of the reorganization of a prepaid health plan or a merger of the plan with its subsidiary corporation, its parent corporation, or another subsidiary of its parent corporation, provided the following conditions are met:

(a) The resulting or surviving organization assures the continued and accessible delivery of health care services to enrollees.

(b) The plan has satisfactorily demonstrated the fiscal and administrative soundness of the newly proposed organization.

(c) If the proposed reorganization or merger results in any change of the plan’s service area or delivery of health care services, or if the director otherwise deems it to be appropriate, the following additional conditions shall be met: 

(1) Public notice is given and if necessary a public hearing is held as required by Section 14300.

(2) The enrollees of the plan are informed of the impending reorganization or merger, any resulting changes in the service area or delivery of health care services, and such other information required by subdivision (a) of Section 14406 at least 30 days in advance of the reorganization or merger.

(3) The enrollees of the plan are given the option of disenrolling for any cause within 60 days following the effective date of the reorganization or merger. 

(d) The plan meets such other requirements as deemed necessary by the department in order to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1073, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.3.

The department shall renew a contract unless good cause is shown for nonrenewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1073, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14304.5.

Each prepaid health plan shall provide directly or through subcontractors, not less than the basic scope of health care benefits as defined in Section 14256. The director shall establish the scope and duration of such services and may require other services listed in Section 14053 be provided on a risk or nonrisk basis. The director shall encourage the prepaid health plan to provide all of the services enumerated in Section 14053 on a prepaid basis. When mutually agreeable to the prepaid health plan, the department, and the hospital involved, and provided that the confidentiality of the selected hospital contracting rates negotiated pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14081) is maintained by all parties, contracts entered into by the department pursuant to this chapter may provide for alternative arrangements in any or all of a prepaid health plan’s Medi-Cal service area for the payment of inpatient hospital services using Medi-Cal hospital inpatient rates.

Subject to prior approval by the director, any additional services other than those listed in Section 14053 may be provided at reasonable cost to Medi-Cal enrollees, provided the enrollees are notified of services for which they will be charged and the amount of the charge prior to rendering such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1348, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

14305.

The department may limit the scope of health care benefits provided by a prepaid health plan under this chapter to exclude the care of illness or injury which results from or is greatly aggravated by, a catastrophic occurrence, including, but not limited to, an act of war, declared or undeclared, and which occurs subsequent to enrollment in the prepaid health plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14308.

(a) Each prepaid health plan shall furnish to the director such information and reports as required by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(b) The director may require a prepaid health plan to provide the director with information and reports that are furnished by the prepaid health plan to the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(c) The director may, by regulation, require plans to
 furnish statistical information to the extent the information is necessary for the department to establish rates of payment pursuant to Section 14301.1 and to provide reports pursuant to Section 14313. The department shall, to the extent feasible, accept this information in a form which is consistent with reports required to be provided pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975. In the case of a hospital based plan that is a health maintenance organization qualified pursuant to Title XIII of the federal Public Health Service Act, and that has more than one million enrollees, of whom less than 10 percent are Medi-Cal enrollees, information required pursuant to this subdivision shall consist of reports required to be made to the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Title XIII of the federal Public Health Service
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 3.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14309.

The department shall provide for a continuing study of the quality of care and services resulting from the operation of this chapter and for surveys and reports on prepaid health plans. With respect to such plans contracted for under this chapter, the department may contract with professional organizations for studies and reports of the experience of such plans as to the standards of care available to eligible persons, gross and net costs, administrative costs, benefits, utilization of benefits, the portion of actual personal expenditures of eligible persons for health care which are being met by prepaid benefits, and the methods of evaluating and improving the quality of, and controlling the costs of, health care provided under such contracts. However, this section shall not be construed to require any prepaid health plan to provide accounting data or statistical data not required by regulations adopted by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14311.

Prepaid health plans, the services they provide, and the persons receiving these services shall not be subject to the limitations on services set forth in Section 14133, 14133.1, 14133.25, or 14133.3 or subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 14120, or subdivision (c) of Section 14105. Notwithstanding this section, the requirements set forth in Section 14301 for the determination of prospective per capita rates of payment for services provided under this chapter to Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in a prepaid health plan shall remain unchanged.

Nothing in this section or in Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) shall relieve the director of his responsibility to provide the benefits provided for in Section 14132. Where a contract between the department and a prepaid health plan does not require the prepaid health plan to provide a benefit to which a Medi-Cal recipient is otherwise entitled, the recipient shall be entitled to receive such benefit pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14312.

The director shall adopt all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter. In adopting such rules and regulations, the director shall be guided by the needs of eligible persons as well as prevailing practices in the delivery of health care on a prepaid basis. Except where otherwise required by federal law or by this part, the rules and regulations shall be consistent with the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 38.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14314.

The director may recover a due and payable overpayment made to a prepaid health plan by means of a repayment agreement executed between such prepaid health plan and the director, and by any other means available at law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

14315.

When it has been determined that a prepaid health plan has received an overpayment which is due and payable, the director may recover such overpayment by offset against any amount currently due to the prepaid health plan under the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1046.)
-------------------------------------------

14316.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, contracts with plans which are entered into, renewed, or amended pursuant to this article may include one or more of the following:

(1) A provision to the effect that if the rate for a plan is less than 90 percent of the estimated Medi-Cal fee-for-service cost, the plan’s rate shall be increased by one-half the difference between the rate fixed and 90 percent of the estimated fee-for-service cost. The rate shall not, however, be less than 85 percent of the estimated fee-for-service costs.

(2) Guaranteed capitation payments for Medi-Cal beneficiaries, who are entitled to benefits under Title IV of the Social Security Act, for a period of six months or less, even if the eligibility for benefits of such beneficiaries terminates prior to the end of the guaranteed payment period. Each guaranteed payment period shall be calculated beginning on the date a beneficiary’s enrollment takes effect.

(3) Benefits in addition to those listed under Section 14132, as long as the provision of such additional services permits plans to remain more cost effective than fee-for-service reimbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 45.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enrollment and Disenrollment [14400. - 14413.]

14400.

Every prepaid health plan shall have an open enrollment period at least once every year. During the open enrollment period the plan shall accept up to the limit of its capacity or the limit of its contract, without restrictions, other than those which may be required by the director, Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are eligible to enroll in such plans. Eligible enrollees shall be accepted in the order in which they apply for enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

No Medi-Cal beneficiary shall be enrolled in a prepaid health plan prior to the time a contract under this chapter is signed by the department and such prepaid health plan is approved by the appropriate state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

The prepaid health plan shall enroll only those Medi-Cal beneficiaries who reside within the contract service area. Prepaid health plans shall use a standard application form prescribed by the department which is readily understandable to the enrollees. A beneficiary shall be enrolled in the prepaid health plan when the beneficiary voluntarily signs the enrollment application agreeing to utilize the health services provided by the prepaid plan and his eligibility for enrollment in that plan is verified by validation of the application by the department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section requiring voluntary enrollment, the department may approve the transfer of the enrollees of one or more prepaid health plans to another prepaid health plan in accordance with the terms of a merger or reorganization approved by the department pursuant to the conditions set forth in Sections 14303.1 and 14303.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

No Medi-Cal beneficiary shall be enrolled in more than one prepaid health plan at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14406.

(a) Within seven days after the effective date of enrollment, the prepaid health plan shall provide in writing the following information to a new enrollee or the family unit of the new enrollee:

(1) An appropriate document identifying the enrollee and authorizing the services or benefits to which that person is entitled under the plan subject to verification of eligibility.

(2) A description of all services and benefits provided by the plan.

(3) An explanation of the procedure for obtaining these services and benefits, including in the case of medical foundations or independent practice associations, the address and telephone number of each primary care physician, dentist, optometrist, psychologist, and in the case of other plans, the address and telephone number of each service site and the location of primary care physicians, dentists, optometrists and psychologists, and in the case of all prepaid health plans, the address and telephone numbers of each hospital, pharmacy, and skilled nursing facility where health care benefits may be obtained. In addition, the explanation shall state the hours and days where each of these facilities are open and the services and benefits available.

(4) The location, telephone number, and procedure for securing 24-hour emergency care and an explanation of and procedure for obtaining out-of-area emergency coverage.

(5) Information setting forth the term of enrollment in the prepaid health plan including the causes for which an enrollee shall lose eligibility in the prepaid health plan.

(6) The procedure for processing and resolving any grievance by enrollees. Such information shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the person responsible for resolving grievances or initiating a grievance procedure.

(7) The procedure by which enrollees may request disenrollment.

(8) Any other information essential to the use of the prepaid health plan as may be required by the department.

(b) The information made available under this section shall be revised and distributed annually to each enrollee or enrollee’s family unit and whenever there is a change in the services provided or the location where they may be obtained. Except for a change which is unforeseeable, all enrollees affected by the change in service or the location of services shall be notified at least 14 days prior to such a change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1061.)
-------------------------------------------

14407.

Enrollment in a prepaid health plan shall be voluntary and a prepaid health plan shall not use false advertising or false statements to induce enrollment. No solicitation of enrollees shall include the granting or offering of any monetary or other valuable consideration for enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14407.1.

(a) A contractor that has entered into a contract with the department under this chapter, or under another Medi-Cal managed care contracting authority, may offer nonmonetary incentives to promote good health practices by its existing Medi-Cal enrollees.

(b) No Medi-Cal managed care contractor may offer an incentive to promote good health practices by its Medi-Cal enrollees prior to written approval by the department. In the absence of other countervailing considerations, the department shall approve, to the extent permitted by federal law, the use by health plans of nonmonetary incentives to enhance health education program efforts to increase member participation, learning, and motivation to do any of the following:

(1) Effectively use managed health care services, including preventive and primary care services, obstetric care, and health education services.

(2) Modify personal health behaviors, achieving and maintaining healthy lifestyles and treatment therapies and positive health outcomes.

(3) Follow self-care regimens and treatment therapies for existing medical conditions, chronic diseases, or health conditions.

(c) If a contractor is a publicly operated entity, the offering of a department-approved, nonmonetary incentive to promote good health practices by enrollees shall not constitute a gift of public funds.

(d) Violations of this section shall be subject to the requirements and penalties set forth in Sections 14408 and 14409, and any regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this article.

(e) The department shall develop and publish written guidelines for the appropriate use of nonmonetary incentives that may be offered to Medi-Cal enrollees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14407.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14407.5, the department shall, to the extent permitted by federal law or under federal waivers which the department may obtain, establish a minimum enrollment period for Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolling in managed care plans under any of the following: 

(1) This chapter. 

(2) Any of the following provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000): 

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3). 

(B) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088). 

(C) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089). 
